District of Columbia statutes.
26-1161.04

Background checks.

The Commissioner may use the NMLS as an agent for requesting information from and distributing information to:

(1)

The Federal Bureau of Investigation;

(2)

The Department of Justice; or

(3)

Other law enforcement agency, regulatory agency, or credit reporting agency.

Mar. 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-172, § 5, 61 DCR 12577